Alabama, session 2026rs, SB283.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. The following amendment to the Constitution
of Alabama of 2022, is proposed:
PROPOSED AMENDMENT
"Section 152
(a)All Except as provided in subsection (b), judges
Page 1

(a)All Except as provided in subsection (b), judges
SB283 INTRODUCED
shall be elected by vote of the electors within the
territorial jurisdiction of their respective courts.
(b) Commencing with the 2028 General Election,
associate justices of the Alabama Supreme Court and judges of
the courts of appeals shall be elected by district as
determined by the Legislature.
Upon ratification of this constitutional amendment, the
Code Commissioner shall number and place this amendment as
appropriate in the constitution omitting this instructional
paragraph and may make the following nonsubstantive revisions:
change capitalization, hierarchy, spelling, and punctuation
for purposes of style and uniformity; correct manifest
grammatical, clerical, and typographical errors; revise
internal or external citations and cross-references; harmonize
language; and translate effective dates.
END OF PROPOSED AMENDMENT
Section 2. An election upon the proposed amendment
shall be held in accordance with Sections 284 and 285 of the
Constitution of Alabama of 2022, and the election laws of this
state. The appropriate election official shall assign a ballot
number for the proposed constitutional amendment on the
election ballot and shall set forth the following description
of the substance or subject matter of the proposed
constitutional amendment:
"Proposing an amendment to the Constitution of Alabama
of 2022, to amend Section 152, to provide for the election of
associate justices of the Alabama Supreme Court and judges of
the courts of appeals by district.
Page 2

the courts of appeals by district.
SB283 INTRODUCED
Proposed by Act ____."
This description shall be followed by the following
language:
"Yes( ) No( )."
Section 3. The proposed amendment shall become valid as
a part of the Constitution of Alabama of 2022, when approved
by a majority of the qualified electors voting thereon.
Page 3